Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [216B.160] TIME-OF-USE RATE PROGRAMS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Electric utility" has the meaning given in section 216B.38, subdivision 5. new text end new text begin (c) "Time-of-use rate" means an electric utility pricing structure where the rate charged to utility customers varies depending on the time of day. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Consent required. new text end new text begin (a) An electric utility that implements a time-of-use rate must require customers to consent to the rate structure. new text end new text begin (b) An electric utility must create a form that the person who owns the home or business receiving electric service must sign to opt in to the time-of-use rate program and allow the electric utility to install the necessary equipment. The form must be in 12-point, boldface type, and must: new text end new text begin (1) clearly state the opt-in is not required and the person's service is not affected if the person does not opt in; new text end new text begin (2) provide an explanation of the time-of-use rate program; and new text end new text begin (3) indicate that written consent is required to install the equipment necessary to implement the time-of-use rate program. new text end